en: PGI, P.G.I., Protected Geographical Indication, PGI - Protected Geographical Indication
bg: ЗГУ, Защитено географско указание
ca: IGP, Indicació Geogràfica Protegida
de: ggA, g.g.A., Geschützte geografische Angabe, Geschützte geographische Angabe
es: IGP, I.G.P., Indicación Geográfica Protegida
fi: SMM, S.M.M., Suojattu maantieteellinen merkintä
fr: IGP, I.G.P, Indication Géographique Protégée, IGP - Indication Géographique Protégée
hr: ZOZP, Z.O.Z.P., zaštićena oznaka zemljopisnog podrijetla
hu: Oltalom alatt álló földrajzi jelzés
it: IGP, I.G.P., Indicazione geografica protetta
nl: BGA, B.G.A., Beschermde geografische aanduiding
pt: IGP, Indicação Geográfica Protegida
sv: SGB, S.G.B., Skyddad geografisk beteckning

en: TSG, t.S.g., Traditional Speciality Guaranteed
bg: Храна с традиционно специфичен характер, ХТСХ
cs: zaručená tradiční specialita, ZTS
da: garanteret traditionel specialitet, GTS
de: gtS, g.t.S., garantiert traditionelle Spezialität
el: εγγυημένο παραδοσιακό ιδιότυπο προϊόν, ΕΠΙΠ
es: Especialidad tradicional garantizada, ETG, E.T.G.
et: garanteeritud traditsiooniline eritunnus, GTE
fi: APT, A.P.T, aito perinteinen tuote
fr: STG, S.t.g., Spécialité traditionnelle garantie
ga: speisialtacht thraidisiúnta ráthaithe, STR
hr: ZTS, Z.T.S., zajamčeno tradicionalni specijalitet
hu: Hagyományos különleges termék, HKT, Garantált hagyományos specialitás
it: specialità tradizionale garantita, STG
lt: garantuotas tradicinis gaminys, GTG
lv: garantēta tradicionālā īpatnība, GTI
mt: speċjalità tradizzjonali garantita, STG
nl: gegarandeerde traditionele specialiteit, GTS
pl: gwarantowana tradycyjna specjalność, GTS
pt: Especialidade Tradicional Garantida, ETG, E.T.G.
ro: specialitate tradițională garantată, STG
sk: zaručená tradičná špecialita, ZTŠ
sl: zajamčena tradicionalna posebnost, ZTP
sv: garanterad traditionell specialitet, GTS

en: GOST
xx: GOST
ru: ГОСТ, GOST

en: Ukrainian state certification system conformity mark
ru: Знак соответствия государственной системы сертификации Украины
uk: Знак відповідності державної системи сертифікації

en: Ukrainian state certification system conformity mark (mandatory certification)
ru: Знак соответствия государственной системы сертификации Украины (обязательная сертификация)
uk: Знак відповідності державної системи сертифікації (обов'язкова сертифікація)

en: Ukrainian state certification system conformity mark (mandatory certification) 003
ru: Знак соответствия государственной системы сертификации Украины (обязательная сертификация) 003
uk: Знак відповідності державної системи сертифікації (обов'язкова сертифікація) 003

en: Ukrainian state certification system conformity mark (voluntary certification)
ru: Знак соответствия государственной системы сертификации Украины (добровольная сертификация)
uk: Знак відповідності державної системи сертифікації (добровільна сертифікація)

en: Green Label - Israel
he: הסימון הירוק

en: High level of fat - Israel
he: שומן בכמות גבוהה

en: High level of sodium - Israel
he: נתרן בכמות גבוהה

en: High level of sugar - Israel
he: סוכר בכמות גבוהה

en: Pure beef
ca: Pura vedella
de: 100% Rindfleisch
fi: puhdasta naudanlihaa, 100% naudanlihaa
fr: Pur bœuf
he: בקר טהור
hu: 100% marhahús, Tiszta marhahús
it: Puro manzo
nl: puur rund

en: Pure butter
ca: Mantega pura
de: 100% Butter
es: Mantequilla pura
fi: puhdasta voita, 100% voita
fr: Pur beurre
he: חמאה טהורה
hu: 100% vaj, Tiszta vaj
it: Burro puro
nl: Pure boter
pt: Pura manteiga, 100% manteiga, manteiga pura

en: pure cocoa butter, pure cocoa butter chocolate
ca: Mantega de cacau pura
de: reine Kakaobutter
es: Manteca de cacao pura
fi: puhdasta kaakaovoita, suklaata puhtaasta kaakaovoista
fr: pur beurre de cacao, chocolat pur beurre de cacao
he: חמאת קקאו טהורה
hr: Čisti kakao maslac
hu: 100% kakaóvaj, tiszta kakaóvaj
it: Burro di cacao puro
nl: Pure cacaoboter
pt: Pura manteiga de cacau, 100% manteiga de cacau, manteiga de cacau pura, manteiga de coco puro

en: Pure juice
ca: Pur suc
de: 100% Saft
es: Zumo puro
fi: Täysmehu
fr: Pur jus
he: מיץ טהור
hu: 100%-os gyümölcslé
it: Succo puro
pt: Sumo puro, puro sumo 100% sumo, suco puro, 100% suco, puro suco

en: Pure pork
ca: Pur porc
de: 100% Schweinefleisch
es: Puro cerdo
fi: puhdasta porsaanlihaa, 100% porsaanlihaa, puhdasta sianlihaa, 100% sianlihaa
fr: Pur porc
hu: 100% sertéshús, tiszta sertéshús
it: Maiale puro
nl: puur varkensvlees
pl: Wieprzowina bez domieszek
pt: Carne de porco pura, Puro bife, 100% bife, bife puro, pura carne de porco, 100% carne de porco

en: Rainforest Alliance
xx: Rainforest Alliance, Rainforest Alliance People & Nature, Rainforest Alliance People and Nature, Rainforest, Rainforest Alliance Certified
ca: Aliança Tropical
cs: certifikováno rainforest alliance, certifikovano rainforest alliance
da: Rainforest Alliance, Rainforest Alliance-certificeret
de: Rainforest Alliance, Rainforest Alliance-zertifiziert
es: Alianza para Bosques
fr: Vérifié Rainforest Alliance, Certifié Rainforest Alliance
hr: Certificirano Rainforest Alliance
it: Alleanza della Foresta Pluviale
nb: Rainforest Alliance, Rainforest Alliance-sertifisert
sv: Rainforest Alliance, Rainforest Alliance-certifierad

en: Rainforest Alliance Tea
xx: Rainforest Alliance Tea
de: Rainforest Alliance Tee
fr: Rainforest Alliance Thé
nl: Rainforest Alliance Thee
sv: Rainforest Alliance Te

en: Rainforest Alliance Rooibos
xx: Rainforest Alliance Rooibos

en: Rainforest Alliance Black Tea
xx: Rainforest Alliance Black Tea
de: Rainforest Alliance Schwarzer Tee
fr: Rainforest Alliance Thé noir